Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.938

Director of fire protection—Appointment—Duties.

(1) Wherever the term state fire marshal appears in the Revised Code of Washington or the Washington Administrative Code it shall mean the director of fire protection.

(2) The chief of the Washington state patrol shall appoint an officer who shall be known as the director of fire protection.

(3) The director of fire protection may designate one or more deputies and may delegate to those deputies his or her duties and authorities as deemed appropriate.

(4) The director of fire protection shall prepare a biennial budget pertaining to fire protection services. Such biennial budget shall be submitted as part of the Washington state patrol's budget request.

(5) The director of fire protection, shall implement and administer, within constraints established by budgeted resources, all duties of the chief of the Washington state patrol that are to be carried out through the director of fire protection, and all of the duties of the director of fire protection. Such administration shall include negotiation of agreements with the state board for community and technical colleges and the state colleges and universities as provided in RCW 43.43.934. Programs covered by such agreements shall include, but not be limited to, planning curricula, developing and delivering instructional programs and materials, and using existing instructional personnel and facilities. Where appropriate, such contracts shall also include planning and conducting instructional programs at the state fire service training center.

[ 2012 c 229 s 819; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 46; 1995 c 369 s 18; 1993 c 280 s 71; 1986 c 266 s 58. Formerly RCW 43.63A.340.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Application—Effective date—1995 c 369: See notes following RCW 43.43.930.

Effective date—1993 c 280: See RCW 43.330.902.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.